Maine, session 132, LD763.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Transfer from General Fund unappropriated surplus; Department
of Health and Human Services, Nursing Facilities. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, as soon as practicable, the State Controller shall transfer $50,000,000
from the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund to the Department of Health and
Human Services, Nursing Facilities program, Nursing Facility Reform Transition Fund
Other Special Revenue Funds account for the purpose of funding components of nursing
facility rates.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: Provides one-time funding in the Nursing Facility Reform Transition Fund Other
Special Revenue Funds account to fund components of nursing facility rates.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $50,000,000 $0